Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 1
DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 PROGRAMS TO BE ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT

PART 3 MEDICAL SERVICES BOARD

PART 4 HEALTH CARE COVERAGE COOPERATIVE RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY

PART 5 COOPERATIVE HEALTH CARE AGREEMENTS INVOLVING HOSPITALS

PART 6 COMMISSION ON FAMILY MEDICINE

PART 7 HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS' ACCOUNTABILITY TO COMMUNITIES

PART 8 MEDICAID NONMEDICAL AND NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION